Utah statutes.
39-1-15.   Adjutant general -- Disposition of unserviceable property.
(1)  All military property of the state, which after proper inspection shall
be found unserviceable, shall, under the direction of the governor, be
disposed of by the adjutant general at public or private sale as he may
consider advisable.
(2) (a)  If the inspecting officer decides that the value of the property
described in Subsection (1) exceeds $50 in value, the sale in accordance with
Subsection (1) shall be made after notice is published:
(i)  10 days before the sale in a newspaper published in the county where the
sale will occur; and
(ii)  in accordance within Section 45-1-101 10 days before the sale.
(b)  If such unserviceable property shall be found by the inspecting officer
to be of no actual value, it shall be destroyed under the direction of the
adjutant general.
